test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kissa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - tikká:
    tikká+N+Sg+Nom:  tikká
    tikká+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊká
    tikká+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊká
    tikká+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikká+N+Sg+Loc:  tikkáást
    tikká+N+Sg+Com:  tikkáin
    tikká+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊkáttáá
    tikká+N+Ess:  tikkán
    tikká+N+Par:  tikkád
    tikká+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊkáh
    tikká+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊkái
    tikká+N+Pl+Acc:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Ill:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Loc:  tiˊkáin
    tikká+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊkáiguin
    tikká+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊkáittáá

  Noun - sivlá:
    sivlá+N+Sg+Nom:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Gen:  siˊvlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Acc:  siˊvlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Ill:  siivlán
    sivlá+N+Sg+Loc:  sivláást
    sivlá+N+Sg+Com:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊvláttáá
    sivlá+N+Ess:  sivlán
    sivlá+N+Par:  sivlád
    sivlá+N+Pl+Nom:  siˊvláh
    sivlá+N+Pl+Gen: [siivlái, siˊvlái]
    sivlá+N+Pl+Acc:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Ill:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Loc:  siˊvláin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Com:  siˊvláiguin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊvláittáá

  Noun - nollá:
    nollá+N+Sg+Nom:  nollá
    nollá+N+Sg+Gen:  noˊḷá
    nollá+N+Sg+Acc:  noˊḷá
    nollá+N+Sg+Ill:  nooḷán
    nollá+N+Sg+Loc:  nolláást
    nollá+N+Sg+Com:  nolláin
    nollá+N+Sg+Abe:  noˊḷáttáá
    nollá+N+Ess:  nollán
    nollá+N+Par:  nollád
    nollá+N+Pl+Nom:  noˊḷáh
    nollá+N+Pl+Gen:  noˊḷái
    nollá+N+Pl+Acc:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Ill:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Loc:  [nolláin, noˊḷáin]
    nollá+N+Pl+Com:  noˊḷáiguin
    nollá+N+Pl+Abe:  noˊḷáittáá

  Noun - rottá:
    rottá+N+Sg+Nom:  rottá
    rottá+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊtá
    rottá+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊtá
    rottá+N+Sg+Ill:  rootán
    rottá+N+Sg+Loc:  rottáást
    rottá+N+Sg+Com:  rottáin
    rottá+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊtáttáá
    rottá+N+Ess:  rottán
    rottá+N+Par:  rottád
    rottá+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊtáh
    rottá+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊtái
    rottá+N+Pl+Acc:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Ill:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Loc:  roˊtáin
    rottá+N+Pl+Com:  roˊtáiguin
    rottá+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊtáittáá

  Noun - rullá:
    rullá+N+Sg+Nom:  rullá
    rullá+N+Sg+Gen:  ruˊḷá
    rullá+N+Sg+Acc:  ruˊḷá
    rullá+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuḷán
    rullá+N+Sg+Loc:  rulláást
    rullá+N+Sg+Com:  rulláin
    rullá+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊḷáttáá
    rullá+N+Ess:  rullán
    rullá+N+Par:  rullád
    rullá+N+Pl+Nom:  ruˊḷáh
    rullá+N+Pl+Gen:  ruˊḷái
    rullá+N+Pl+Acc:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Ill:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Loc:  ruˊḷáin
    rullá+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊḷáiguin
    rullá+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊḷáittáá

  Noun - kukká:
    kukká+N+Sg+Nom:  kukká
    kukká+N+Sg+Gen:  kuˊká
    kukká+N+Sg+Acc:  kuˊká
    kukká+N+Sg+Ill:  kuukán
    kukká+N+Sg+Loc:  kukkáást
    kukká+N+Sg+Com:  kukkáin
    kukká+N+Sg+Abe:  kuˊkáttáá
    kukká+N+Ess: kukkán
    kukká+N+Par: kukkád
    kukká+N+Pl+Nom:  kuˊkáh
    kukká+N+Pl+Gen:  kuˊkái
    kukká+N+Pl+Acc:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Ill:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Loc:  kuˊkáin
    kukká+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊkáiguin
    kukká+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊkáittáá

  Noun - sohvá:
    sohvá+N+Sg+Nom:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Gen:  soˊhvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Acc: soˊhvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Ill:  soohván
    sohvá+N+Sg+Loc:  sohváást
    sohvá+N+Sg+Com:  sohváin
    sohvá+N+Sg+Abe:  soˊhváttáá
    sohvá+N+Ess:  sohván
    sohvá+N+Par:  sohvád
    sohvá+N+Pl+Nom:  soˊhváh
    sohvá+N+Pl+Gen:  soˊhvái
    sohvá+N+Pl+Acc:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Ill:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Loc:  soˊhváin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Com:  soˊhváiguin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Abe:  soˊhváittáá

  Noun - rovvá:
    rovvá+N+Sg+Nom:  rovvá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊṿá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊṿá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Ill:  rooṿán
    rovvá+N+Sg+Loc:  rovváást
    rovvá+N+Sg+Com:  rovváin
    rovvá+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊṿáttáá
    rovvá+N+Ess:  rovván
    rovvá+N+Par:  rovvád
    rovvá+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊṿáh
    rovvá+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊṿái
    rovvá+N+Pl+Acc:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Ill:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Loc:  roˊṿáin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Com:  roˊṿáiguin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊṿáittáá

  Noun - sukká:
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom:  sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill:  suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc:  suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com:  suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess:  sukkán
    sukká+N+Par:  sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen:  suˊhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc:  suˊháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com:  suˊháiguin
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊháittáá

  Noun - juŋkká:
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Nom:  juŋkká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Gen:  juˊŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Acc:  juˊŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Ill:  juuŋkán
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Loc:  juŋkkáást
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Com:  juŋkkáin
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Abe:  juˊŋkáttáá
    juŋkká+N+Ess:  juŋkkán
    juŋkká+N+Par:  juŋkkád
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Nom:  juˊŋkáh
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Gen:  juˊŋkái
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Acc:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Ill:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Loc:  juˊŋkáin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Com:  juˊŋkáiguin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Abe:  juˊŋkáittáá

  Noun - tuvvá:
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Nom:  tuvvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Gen:  tuˊṿá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Acc:  tuˊṿá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Ill:  tuuṿán
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Loc:  tuvváást
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Com:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊváttáá
    tuvvá+N+Ess:  tuvván
    tuvvá+N+Par:  tuvvád
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊṿáh
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Gen:  tuˊṿái
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Acc:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Ill:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Loc:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊṿáiguin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊṿáittáá

  Noun - kámppá:
    kámppá+N+Sg+Nom:  kámppá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Gen:  káˊmpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Acc:  káˊmpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Ill:  káámpán
    kámppá+N+Sg+Loc:  kámppáást
    kámppá+N+Sg+Com:  kámppáin
    kámppá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊmpáttáá
    kámppá+N+Ess:  kámppán
    kámppá+N+Par: kámppád
    kámppá+N+Pl+Nom:  káˊmpáh
    kámppá+N+Pl+Gen:  káˊmpái
    kámppá+N+Pl+Acc:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Ill:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Loc:  káˊmpáin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊmpáiguin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊmpáittáá

  Noun - hommá:
    hommá+N+Sg+Nom:  hommá
    hommá+N+Sg+Gen:  hoˊṃá
    hommá+N+Sg+Acc:  hoˊṃá
    hommá+N+Sg+Ill:  hooṃán
    hommá+N+Sg+Loc:  hommáást
    hommá+N+Sg+Com:  hommáin
    hommá+N+Sg+Abe:  hoˊṃáttáá
    hommá+N+Ess:  hommán
    hommá+N+Par: hommád
    hommá+N+Pl+Nom:  hoˊṃáh
    hommá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hommái, hoˊṃái]
    hommá+N+Pl+Acc:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Ill:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Loc:  hoˊṃáin
    hommá+N+Pl+Com:  hoˊṃáiguin
    hommá+N+Pl+Abe:  hoˊṃáittáá

  Noun - torppá:
    torppá+N+Sg+Nom:  torppá
    torppá+N+Sg+Gen:  toˊrpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Acc:  toˊrpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Ill:  toorpán
    torppá+N+Sg+Loc:  torppáást
    torppá+N+Sg+Com:  torppáin
    torppá+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊrpáttáá
    torppá+N+Ess:  torppán
    torppá+N+Par: torppád
    torppá+N+Pl+Nom:  toˊrpáh
    torppá+N+Pl+Gen:  toˊrpái
    torppá+N+Pl+Acc:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Ill:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Loc:  toˊrpáin
    torppá+N+Pl+Com:  toˊrpáiguin
    torppá+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊrpáittáá

  Noun - kárttá:
    kárttá+N+Sg+Nom:  kárttá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Gen:  káˊrtá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Acc: káˊrtá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Ill:  káártán
    kárttá+N+Sg+Loc:  kárttáást
    kárttá+N+Sg+Com:  kárttáin
    kárttá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊrtáttáá
    kárttá+N+Ess:  kárttán
    kárttá+N+Par: kárttád
    kárttá+N+Pl+Nom:  káˊrtáh
    kárttá+N+Pl+Gen:  káˊrtái
    kárttá+N+Pl+Acc:  kárttáid
    kárttá+N+Pl+Ill:  kárttáid
    kárttá+N+Pl+Loc:  káˊrtáin
    kárttá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊrtáiguin
    kárttá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊrtáittáá

  Noun - kuáddá:
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuádˊdá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Acc: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com:  kuádˊdáin
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊdáttáá
    kuáddá+N+Ess:  kuádˊdán
    kuáddá+N+Par: kuádˊdád
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuádáh
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuádái, kuáˊdái]
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuádáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuádˊdáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuádáin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊdáiguin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊdáittáá

  Noun - puánnjá:
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Nom:  puánˊnjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Gen:  puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Acc: puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Ill:  puánján
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Loc:  puánjást
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Com:  puánˊnjáin
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊnjáttáá
    puánnjá+N+Ess:  puánˊnján
    puánnjá+N+Par: puánˊnjád
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Nom:  puánjáh
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Gen: [puánjái, puáˊnjái]
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Acc:  puánjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Ill:  puánnjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Loc:  puánjáin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊnjáiguin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊnjáittáá

  Noun - suájá: # á-stems - ok
    suájá+N+Sg+Nom: suáj̣á    
    suájá+N+Sg+Gen: suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Ill: suáj̣án
    suájá+N+Sg+Loc: suáˊjáást
    suájá+N+Sg+Com: suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Sg+Abe: suáˊjáttáá
    suájá+N+Ess: suáiján
    suájá+N+Par: suáijád
    suájá+N+Pl+Nom: suáˊjáh
    suájá+N+Pl+Gen: suáˊjái
    suájá+N+Pl+Acc: suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Ill: suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Loc: suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Pl+Com: suáˊjáiguin
    suájá+N+Pl+Abe: suáˊjáittáá

  Noun - čiähá:
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom:  [čiäḥá, čiähá]
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen:  čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Acc:  čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill:  [čiäḥán, čiähán]
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc:  čiäṿást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com:  čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Sg+Abe:  čiäˊṿáttáá
    čiähá+N+Ess:  čiähán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom:  čiäṿáh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: [čiäṿái, čiäˊṿái]
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc:  čiäṿáid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill:  čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc:  čiäṿáin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com:  čiäˊṿáiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe:  čiäˊṿáittáá

  Noun - liššá:
    liššá+N+Sg+Nom:  liššá
    liššá+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊṣ̌á
    liššá+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊṣ̌á
    liššá+N+Sg+Ill:  liiṣ̌án
    liššá+N+Sg+Loc:  liššáást
    liššá+N+Sg+Com:  liššáin
    liššá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊṣ̌áttáá
    liššá+N+Ess:  liššán
    liššá+N+Par: liššád
    liššá+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊṣ̌áh
    liššá+N+Pl+Gen:  liṣ̌ái
    liššá+N+Pl+Acc:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Ill:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊṣ̌áin
    liššá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊṣ̌áiguin
    liššá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊṣ̌áittáá


  Noun - vársá:
    vársá+N+Sg+Nom:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Gen:  váˊrsá
    vársá+N+Sg+Acc: váˊrsá
    vársá+N+Sg+Ill:  váársán
    vársá+N+Sg+Loc:  vársáást
    vársá+N+Sg+Com:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊrsáttáá
    vársá+N+Ess:  vársán
    vársá+N+Par: vársád
    vársá+N+Pl+Nom:  váˊrsáh
    vársá+N+Pl+Gen:  [vársái, váˊrsái]
    vársá+N+Pl+Acc:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Ill:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Loc:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Pl+Com:  váˊrsáiguin
    vársá+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊrsáittáá
